North Carolina, session 2025, SB706.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 105-187.19(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Each quarter, the Secretary shall credit thirty percent (30%) of the net tax proceeds to
the General Fund. Scrap Tire Disposal Account. In the event the amount in the Account exceeds
three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) at the end of any fiscal year, such excess shall be
credited to the Highway Fund. The Secretary shall distribute the remaining seventy percent (70%)
of the net tax proceeds among the counties on a per capita basis according to the most recent
annual population estimates certified to the Secretary by the State Budget Officer."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 130A-309.63 as it existed immediately prior to repeal is
reenacted and reads as rewritten:
"§ 130A-309.63. Scrap Tire Disposal Account.
(a) Creation. – The Scrap Tire Disposal Account is established as a nonreverting account
within the Department. Department of Environmental Quality. The Account consists of revenue
credited to the Account from the proceeds of the scrap tire disposal tax imposed by Article 5B of
Chapter 105 of the General Statutes.
(b) Use. – The Department may use revenue in the Account only as authorized by this
section.
(1) The Department may use up to fifty percent (50%) seventy-five percent (75%)
of the revenue in the Account to make grants to units of local government to
assist them in disposing of scrap tires. To administer the grants, the
Department shall establish procedures for applying for a grant and the criteria
for selecting among grant applicants. The criteria shall include the financial
ability of a unit of local government to provide for scrap tire disposal, the
severity of a unit of local government's scrap tire disposal problem, the effort
made by a unit of local government to ensure that only tires generated in the
normal course of business in this State are provided free disposal, and the
effort made by a unit of local government to provide for scrap tire disposal
within the resources available to it.
(2) The Department may use up to forty percent (40%) fifteen percent (15%) of
the revenue in the Account to make grants to encourage the use of processed
scrap tire materials. These grants may be made to encourage the use of
tire-derived fuel, crumb rubber, carbon black, or other components of tires for
use in products such as fuel, tires, mats, auto parts, gaskets, flooring material,
or other applications of processed tire materials. These grants shall be made
in consultation with the Department of Commerce, the Division of
Environmental Assistance and Outreach of the Department, and, where
appropriate, the Department of Transportation. Grants to encourage the use of
processed scrap tire materials shall not be used to process tires.
*S706-v-4*

(3) The Department may use up to one hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($175,000) of the revenue in the Account for administrative costs and to
support a position to provide local governments with assistance in developing
and implementing scrap tire management programs designed to complete the
cleanup of nuisance tire collection sites and prevent scrap tires generated from
outside of the State from being presented for free disposal in the State.position
for implementation of the requirements of this Part.
(4) The Department may use the remaining revenue in the Account only to clean
up illegal scrap tire collection sites that the Department has determined are a
nuisance. The Department may use funds in the Account to clean up a
nuisance tire collection site only if no other funds are available for that
purpose.
(c) Eligibility. – A unit of local government is not eligible for a grant for scrap tire
disposal unless its costs for disposing of scrap tires for the six-month period preceding the date
the unit of local government files an application for a grant exceeded the amount the unit of local
government received during that period from the proceeds of the scrap tire tax under
G.S. 105-187.19. A grant to a unit of local government for scrap tire disposal may not exceed the
unit of local government's unreimbursed cost for the six-month period.
(e)(d) Reporting. – The Department shall include in the report to be delivered to the
Environmental Review Commission on or before 15 January of each year pursuant to
G.S. 130A-309.06(c) a description of the implementation of the North Carolina Scrap Tire
Disposal Act for the fiscal year ending the preceding 30 June. June 30. The description of the
implementation of the North Carolina Scrap Tire Disposal Act shall include the beginning and
ending balances in the Account for the reporting period, the amount credited to the Account
during the reporting period, and the amount of revenue used for grants and to clean up nuisance
tire collection sites."
SECTION 1.(c) G.S. 130A-309.64 is repealed.
SECTION 1.(d) G.S. 130A-309.06(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) The Department shall report to the Environmental Review Commission and the Fiscal
Research Division on or before April 15 of each year on the status of solid waste management
efforts in the State. The report shall include all of the following:
…
(10) A description of the implementation of the North Carolina Scrap Tire Disposal
Act that includes the beginning and ending balances in the Scrap Tire Disposal
Account for the reporting period, the amount credited to the Scrap Tire
Disposal Account during the reporting period, and the amount of revenue used
for grants and to clean up nuisance tire collection under the provisions of
G.S. 130A-309.64.as required by G.S. 130A-309.63(d).
…."
SECTION 1.(e) G.S. 130A-309.09C(g) reads as rewritten:
"(g) In addition to any other penalties provided by law, a unit of local government that
does not comply with the requirements of G.S. 130A-309.09A(b), G.S. 130A-309.09A(d), and
G.S. 130A-309.09B(a) shall not be eligible for grants from the Solid Waste Management Trust
Fund Fund, the Scrap Tire Disposal Account, or the White Goods Management Account and
shall not receive the proceeds of the scrap tire disposal tax imposed by Article 5B of Chapter 105
of the General Statutes or the proceeds of the white goods disposal tax imposed by Article 5C of
Chapter 105 of the General Statutes to which the unit of local government would otherwise be
entitled. The Secretary shall notify the Secretary of Revenue to withhold payment of these funds
to any unit of local government that fails to comply with the requirements of
G.S. 130A-309.09A(b), G.S. 130A-309.09A(d), and G.S. 130A-309.09B(a). Proceeds of the
scrap tire disposal tax that are withheld pursuant to this subsection shall be credited to the General
Page 2 Senate Bill 706-Ratified

Fund and may be used as provided in G.S. 130A-309.64. Highway Fund. Proceeds of the white
goods disposal tax that are withheld pursuant to this subsection shall be credited to the General
Fund and may be used as provided in G.S. 130A-309.83.Highway Fund."
SECTION 1.(f) G.S. 130A-309.54 reads as rewritten:
"§ 130A-309.54. Use of scrap tire tax proceeds.
Article 5B of Chapter 105 imposes a tax on new tires to provide funds for the disposal of
scrap tires, for the cleanup of inactive hazardous waste sites under Part 3 of this Article, and for
all the purposes for which the Bernard Allen Memorial Emergency Drinking Water Fund may
be used under G.S. 87-98. tires. A county may use proceeds of the tax distributed to it under that
Article only for the disposal of scrap tires pursuant to the provisions of this Part or for the
abatement of a nuisance pursuant to G.S. 130A-309.60."
SECTION 1.(g) This section becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies to
quarterly crediting of the proceeds of the scrap tire disposal tax occurring on or after that date.
SECTION 2. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 30th day of June, 2025.
s/ Phil Berger
President Pro Tempore of the Senate
s/ Donna McDowell White
Presiding Officer of the House of Representatives
_____________________________________
Josh Stein
Governor
Approved __________.m. this ______________ day of ___________________, 2025
Senate Bill 706-Ratified Page 3